California, session 20252026, SB868.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. (a) The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:(1) Electricity is an essential resource, especially on hot summer days.(2) The rising cost of electricity is a barrier to basic necessities, such as air conditioning. necessities.(3) Interconnection fees and processes can add substantial costs and time to the adoption of customer-sited solar and energy storage projects.(4) It is the policy of the state to promote and encourage the use of solar energy systems and to limit obstacles to their use.(b) It is the intent of the Legislature to encourage the installation of solar energy systems by removing obstacles to, and minimizing the costs of, those systems.SEC. 2. Chapter 13 (commencing with Section 8530) is added to Division 4.1 of the Public Utilities Code, to read: CHAPTER 13. Portable Solar Generation Devices8530. For purposes of this chapter, all of the following definitions apply:(a) “Electrical corporation” has the same meaning as defined in Section 218.(b) “Local publicly owned electric utility” has the same meaning as defined in Section 224.3.(c) “Portable solar generation device” means a moveable photovoltaic energy generation device that meets all of the following conditions:(1) Has a maximum aggregated AC output of no more than 1,200 watts per dwelling.(2) Is designed to be connected to and disconnected from a building’s electrical system through a single standard electrical outlet. receptacle.(3) Is intended to offset the customer’s onsite electricity consumption.(4) Meets the standards of the most recent version of the National Electrical Code and the California Electrical Code (Part 3 of Title 24 of the California Code of Regulations).(5) Is certified as a plug-in photovoltaic system by Underwriters Laboratories or an equivalent nationally recognized testing laboratory.(6) Includes a feature, certified by Underwriters Laboratories or an equivalent nationally recognized testing laboratory, that isolates the portable solar generation device from the building’s electrical system to prevent the portable solar generation device from backfeeding electricity to the electrical grid during a power outage.8531. (a) A portable solar generation device is exempt from all interconnection requirements imposed by state law, the commission, electrical corporation rules, or local publicly owned electric utility rules, including, but not limited to, any requirement to enter into an interconnection agreement.(b) An electrical corporation or a local publicly owned electric utility shall not require a customer using a portable solar generation device to do any of the following:(1) Obtain the electrical corporation’s or local publicly owned electric utility’s approval before installing or using the portable solar generation device.(2) Pay any fee or charge related to the portable solar generation device or the electricity the portable solar generation device feeds into a building’s electrical system.(3) Install any additional controls or equipment beyond what is integrated into the portable solar generation device.(c) An electrical corporation or a local publicly owned electric utility may require a customer using a portable solar generation device to notify the electrical corporation or local publicly owned electric utility, using a simple online registration form, of the address address, make, model, and size of the portable solar generation device. The notification shall not require approval of the customer’s use of the portable solar generation device by the electrical corporation or local publicly owned electric utility.(d) Any device that does not meet all of the conditions listed in subdivision (c) of Section 8530 does not qualify as a portable solar generation device under this chapter and therefore does not qualify for the exemptions established pursuant to this section.SEC. 3. No reimbursement is required by this act pursuant to Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution because a local agency or school district has the authority to levy service charges, fees, or assessments sufficient to pay for the program or level of service mandated by this act or because costs that may be incurred by a local agency or school district will be incurred because this act creates a new crime or infraction, eliminates a crime or infraction, or changes the penalty for a crime or infraction, within the meaning of Section 17556 of the Government Code, or changes the definition of a crime within the meaning of Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution.